Washington statutes.
RCW 12.08.080

Uncontroverted allegations—Effect.

Every material allegation in a complaint, or relating to a setoff in an answer, not denied by the pleading of the adverse party, shall, on the trial, be taken to be true, except that when a defendant, who has not been served with a copy of the complaint, fails to appear and answer, the plaintiff cannot recover without proving his or her case.

[ 2010 c 8 s 3021; Code 1881 s 1763; 1873 p 345 s 62; 1854 p 232 s 50; RRS s 1785.]